Louisiana, session 2026, HB1186.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:587(A)(1)(a) is hereby amended and reenacted as follows:
§587. Duty to provide information; processing fees; Louisiana Bureau of Criminal
Identification and Information
A.(1)(a) The bureau shall make available upon request, or at other times as
the deputy secretary shall designate, to any eligible criminal justice agency and the
division of administration, office of technology services, the Department of
Education, the Louisiana Department of Health, the state fire marshal when
reviewing applications for licensure, the Louisiana Manufactured Housing
Commission when reviewing applications for licensure, the Department of Children
and Family Services, the Department of Insurance, the Louisiana State Racing
Commission, the Senate Committee on Senate and Governmental Affairs , the House
Committee on House and Governmental Affairs, the secretary of Louisiana Works
or his designee, the Board of River Port Pilot Commissioners and Examiners, the
Louisiana State Board of Home Inspectors, the Office of Financial Institutions in the
office of the governor, the office of the disciplinary counsel of the Louisiana
Attorney Disciplinary Board of the Louisiana State Bar Association; however, as to
any licensed attorney this information shall be provided only after the issuance of a
formal charge against the attorney, the Louisiana Supreme Court Committee on Bar
Admissions, the municipal or parish department or personnel responsible for
reviewing applications for alcoholic beverage outlet permits, the Louisiana Uniform
Construction Code Commission, and the legislative auditor any information
Page 2 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
contained in the criminal history record and identification files of the bureau. The
Department of Children and Family Services may provide information secured
pursuant to this Subsection to all federal and state agencies providing child support
enforcement services.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 37:21(B)(introductory paragraph) is hereby amended and reenacted
and R.S. 37:21(B)(12) and (13) and Chapter 62 of Title 37 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes
of 1950, comprised of R.S. 37:3727 through 3750, are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§21. Limitations on disciplinary proceedings by professional or occupational boards
and commissions
* * *
B. The provisions of this Section shall do not apply to the following:
* * *
(12) The Louisiana State Licensing Board for Contractors.
(13) The Louisiana Uniform Construction Code Commission.
* * *
CHAPTER 62. BUILDING CODE ADOPTION & INSPECTOR LICENSING LAW
PART I. GENERAL
§3727. Purpose; legislative intent
The purpose of the legislature in enacting this Chapter is to maintain
reasonable standards of construction in commercial and residential buildings and
other structures in the state consistent with the public health, safety, and welfare of
its citizens. This Chapter is enacted to enable this state to promulgate a Uniform
Construction Code to govern the construction, reconstruction, alteration, and repair
of commercial and residential buildings and other structures. The Uniform
Construction Code is intended to establish uniform performance standards providing
reasonable safeguards for health, safety, welfare, comfort, and security balanced with
affordability for the residents of this state who are occupants and users of buildings,
and will provide for the use of modern methods, devices, materials, and techniques.
To secure these purposes, the Louisiana Uniform Construction Code Commission
Page 3 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
shall license persons engaged in the enforcement of the Uniform Construction Code.
The intent of the legislature is that the Louisiana Uniform Construction Code
Commission shall monitor building construction projects to ensure compliance with
the Uniform Construction Code and licensure requirements of this Chapter.
§3728. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the meanings ascribed to
them in this Section, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Applicant" means a person who is applying for a public inspector,
private inspector, or private inspector company license with the commission.
(2) "Board" means the Louisiana State Licensing Board for Contractors.
(3) "Building inspector" means a person who performs building inspections
and is responsible for the enforcement of the Uniform Construction Code when
inspecting structures for compliance with the state building code, in accordance with
the particular classification specified on his license issued by the commission.
(4) "Building official" means a licensed inspector holding a general
classification who has been delegated authority by a senior official of a public entity
to act with the highest level of authority delegated to that public entity regarding
inspections for the enforcement of the Uniform Construction Code.
(5) "Commercial structure" means a building or facility primarily used for
business, commerce, or professional activity, not including a building or facility used
for a residential, agricultural, or industrial manufacturing purpose.
(6) "Commission" means the Louisiana Uniform Construction Code
Commission.
(7) "Dwelling unit" means a single unit providing complete, independent
living facilities for one or more persons, including permanent provisions for living,
sleeping, eating, cooking, and sanitation.
(8) "Employee" means a worker whose employer deducts taxes from his
wages and reports his annual earnings to the Internal Revenue Service using a W-2
form.
Page 4 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
(9) "Executive director" means the person appointed by the board to serve
as the chief executive officer of the commission regarding day-to-day operations of
commission business. The executive director may appoint or hire persons as
authorized by this Chapter.
(10) "Familial relationship" means the following relatives of a person,
including half- and step-relatives:
(a) Children and their spouses.
(b) Siblings and their spouses.
(c) Parents.
(d) Spouse.
(e) The parents of a spouse.
(f) Grandchildren and their spouses.
(11) "General license classification" means a category of classifications that
allows a person to act as a building inspector and plans examiner for the enforcement
of the Uniform Construction Code for any structure.
(12) "Inspector" means a person or entity who is responsible for the
inspection and enforcement of the Uniform Construction Code. That person may be
a public inspector or a private inspector. That person may act as a building inspector
or plans examiner depending on the classification held by that person.
(13) "License" means any form of license the commission is authorized to
issue in accordance with this Chapter.
(14) "Manufactured home" and "manufactured housing" mean a factory-built
residential dwelling unit constructed to the standards and codes promulgated by the
United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, pursuant to the
National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42
U.S.C. 5401 et seq., as amended. The terms "manufactured home" and
"manufactured housing" may be used interchangeably and apply to structures bearing
the permanently affixed seal of the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development.
Page 5 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
(15) "Modular home" and "modular housing" mean a factory-built residential
dwelling unit, which is built off-site and transported in sections, constructed in
accordance with the International Residential Code as adopted and amended by the
commission, and is not a unit constructed according to standards of the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development.
(16) "Permit" means an official document issued by a municipal, local, or
parish government authority for the construction, alteration, relocation, enlargement,
replacement, repair, equipment, use and occupancy, location, maintenance, removal,
or demolition of a building, structure, or any appurtenances connected or attached
to such buildings or structures. A permit authorizes the performance of a specified
activity and complies with the Uniform Construction Code and other regulations.
(17) "Person" means a natural or juridical person, whether or not acting as
a principal, trustee, fiduciary, receiver, or any other kind of legal or personal
representative of a person, or as a successor in interest, assignee, agent, factor,
servant, employee, director, officer, or any other representative of a person, state or
local governing authority, or political subdivision.
(18) "Plans examiner" means a person who performs plan review and is
responsible for enforcement of the Uniform Construction Code when performing the
inspection, examination, or review of construction documents for compliance based
upon the license classification specified on his license issued by the commission.
(19) "Principal" means an owner, shareholder, or officer or director of a
corporation; a member or manager of a limited liability company; a general partner
of a partnership; a sole proprietor; a trustee; or a full-time employee with similar
operational control or significant influence with respect to any person as determined
by the commission.
(20) "Private inspector" means a person who enters into a contract or
registers with a public entity, and is not a public employee of that public entity with
which he is contracted or registered, to act in the capacity of an inspector or building
official within the jurisdiction of that public entity. A private inspector may own,
or be employed by, a private inspector company that is contracted or registered to
Page 6 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
provide this service. A licensed private inspector is responsible for the enforcement
of the Uniform Construction Code based upon the classification specified on his
license issued by the commission.
(21) "Private inspector company" means a company, firm, partnership,
corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or other legal
business entity recognized by the law of this state, other than a governmental agency
or an agency thereof, that enters into a contract or is registered with a public entity
to provide one or more employees to act in the capacity of an inspector or building
official within the jurisdiction of that public entity. A licensed private inspector
company is responsible for the enforcement of the Uniform Construction Code based
upon the classifications held by its licensed private inspectors, whether employed by
or principals of that company.
(22) "Public employee" means an employee of a public entity.
(23) "Public entity" means a parish, municipal, or local governmental entity
in this state, including its branches, departments, offices, agencies, boards,
commissions, instrumentalities, officers, officials, employees, and political
subdivisions and the departments, offices, agencies, boards, commissions,
instrumentalities, officers, officials, and employees of that political subdivision.
"Public entity" includes housing authorities, as defined in R.S. 40:384, and their
commissioners and other officers and employees, and sewerage and water boards and
their employees, servants, agents, or subcontractors.
(24) "Public inspector" means a public employee whose job duties include
the enforcement of the Uniform Construction Code by acting as an inspector within
the jurisdiction of the public entity that he is employed by. A licensed public
inspector is responsible for the enforcement of the Uniform Construction Code based
upon the classification specified on his license issued by the commission.
(25) "Residential structure" means a building or structure that is used
primarily for occupancy by a person as a residence. These structures include but are
not limited to single-family dwellings, duplexes that are not more than three floors
Page 7 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
in height, and structures that are part of or adjacent to the building or structures to
be used as a residence.
(26) "Specialty license classification" means a category of classifications
limited in scope, whereby a person holding a specialty license classification may
only perform the scope of work specified by that specialty license classification.
(27) "Uniform Construction Code" means the nationally recognized codes
and standards that have been evaluated, adopted, and amended by the commission
and are enforced within this state.
§3729. Louisiana Uniform Construction Code Commission; membership;
qualifications; tenure; vacancies; term limits
A. The Louisiana Uniform Construction Code Commission is hereby created
within the office of the governor and shall consist of the following members listed
in Subsection B of this Section. Each member shall be of the full age of majority and
shall have been a resident of this state for five successive years preceding his
appointment.
B. The members shall be selected and appointed as follows:
(1) The fire marshal or his designee.
(2) Two licensed inspectors with the Louisiana Uniform Construction Code
Commission.
(3) One member who shall have the greater part of his professional
experience as a licensed electrician or licensed plumber.
(4) One member who shall have the greater part of his professional
experience as a licensed mechanical engineer.
(5) Two members, each of whom shall have had the greater part of his
professional experience as a licensed architect, one of whom shall be a member of
the American Institute of Architects of Louisiana.
(6) One member who shall have the greater part of his professional
experience as a licensed civil engineer specializing in structural engineering.
(7) One member representing the Louisiana Home Builders Association.
Page 8 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
(8) One member representing the Associated Builders and Contractors of
Louisiana.
(9) One member who shall have the greater part of his professional
experience as a licensed residential contractor.
(10) One member who shall have the greater part of his professional
experience as a licensed commercial contractor and who is a member of the
Louisiana Associated General Contractors.
(11) One member who shall have the greater part of his professional
experience in the insurance industry.
(12) One member representing the Building Officials Association of
Louisiana.
(13) One member representing the Louisiana Building Code Alliance.
(14) One member who shall have the greater part of his professional
experience in the manufactured housing industry.
(15) Two members at-large.
C. With the exception of the fire marshal or his designee, who shall serve by
virtue of his position, each member of the commission shall be appointed by the
governor, subject to Senate confirmation, and shall serve at the pleasure of the
governor. With the exception of the fire marshal or his designee, each term for a
member of the commission is for four years, and a member shall serve no more than
two consecutive terms.
D. Each member of the commission shall be reimbursed for attendance at a
commission meeting or when he is required to travel for the official authorized
business of the commission an amount not more than seventy-five dollars per day
plus actual expenses and mileage between his domicile and the place of meeting at
the same rate of reimbursement set by the division of administration.
E. A vacancy shall be filled within ninety days of the vacancy, by
appointment of the governor in accordance with the criteria in Subsection B of this
Section where the vacancy occurs.
Page 9 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
F. The governor may remove a member of the commission for cause, or at
the request of the chairman, for cause or for failure to attend more than half of the
regularly scheduled meetings within a twelve-month period.
G. The members shall designate members to serve as chairman, vice
chairman, secretary, and treasurer by majority vote.
§3730. Powers of the commission
A. The commission shall review and adopt the Uniform Construction Code
published pursuant to the commission's rules and regulations, accept requests for
amendment, and determine if amendment of the Uniform Construction Code is
justified. If the commission determines that an amendment to the Uniform
Construction Code is justified, the commission may enact that amendment after a
finding on the record that the amendment provides a reasonable degree of public
health, safety, affordability, and welfare. The commission shall adopt rules in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of
this Chapter.
B. The commission may issue, approve, suspend, and revoke licenses issued
pursuant to the statutes and rules and regulations governing the commission. The
commission shall hold public meetings to facilitate this power in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act.
C.(1) The commission may enter into contracts for professional and legal
services, open bank accounts to conduct its business, and enter into agreements with
the board for the operation of the commission including reimbursement of the board
for the use of the board's funds used to operate the commission. The executive
director may use the board's funds for the operations of the commission.
(2)(a) In order for the commission to effectively fund its operations and
perform its functions mandated by the legislature, the commission may collect a fee
on any permits issued by a local government authority.
(b) This fee shall be no more than ten dollars per permit. A public entity
responsible for collecting this fee shall not retain any portion of this fee. The fee
Page 10 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
may be waived if the public entity waives the regular permit fees during a declared
emergency, or when issuing a permit to itself or another governmental entity.
(c) A fee collected by a local government authority shall be remitted to the
commission in accordance with the rules and regulations of the commission.
(d) The commission shall set the fee schedule for the upcoming calendar
year by August first of the preceding calendar year.
(e) This administrative fee shall be assessed by the local government
authority on each permit issued. The fee shall be collected by the local government
authority and remitted to the commission. The amount of the fee shall be established
annually by the commission and shall be in addition to all other applicable permit
fees.
D. The commission is vested with the authority necessary to carry out the
intent of the provisions of this Chapter. The commission shall promulgate rules and
regulations for the proper administration and enforcement of this Chapter and to
carry out the purpose of this Chapter, in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act. The enumeration of specific matters which may be made, and the
subject of rules and regulations, shall not be construed to limit general powers of the
commission to make all rules and regulations necessary to effectuate this Chapter.
E. Any rules or regulations enacted by the commission shall be adopted and
promulgated in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
F. Any previously adopted bylaws of the commission are repealed.
G. The commission may create, modify, and repeal committees as needed
to effectively and efficiently perform the functions of the commission.
H.(1) The commission may hire legal counsel as selected by the executive
director and approved by the commission. All legal services for the commission are
under the supervision, control, and authority of the attorney general, and no special
attorney or counsel shall be employed to represent it except in accordance with the
provisions of R.S. 42:262.
(2)(a) However, notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection and the provisions of R.S. 42:262, the commission may contract with
Page 11 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
outside counsel or collection agencies on a contingency fee basis to enforce
judgments that may arise pursuant to this Chapter.
(b) An attorney or collection agency selected pursuant to Subparagraph (a)
of this Paragraph shall be selected following a request for proposals in accordance
with Chapter 17 of Subtitle III of Title 39 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
(c) A contingency fee contract entered into pursuant to this Paragraph shall
require that all collected funds be deposited directly with the commission, and,
thereafter, the contingency fee shall be paid by the commission to the collection
agency or attorney.
I. The commission may sue and be sued and may obtain, in the jurisdiction
in which a violation of the provisions of this Chapter occurs, upon submission of an
affidavit in support, a temporary restraining order and preliminary and permanent
injunctions, without the necessity of posting a bond or other security, restraining and
prohibiting the violation of this Chapter and the performance of any work then being
performed or about to be performed.
J. The commission and its members shall not be held personally liable for
actions taken in good faith in the discharge of their responsibilities. The state shall
hold the commission and its members harmless from all costs, damages, and attorney
fees arising from claims and suits against them regarding matters to which that
immunity applies.
K. In addition to any other duties and powers granted by this Chapter, the
commission shall do all of the following:
(1) Grant licenses to qualified persons, and the commission may provide for
training and education of licensed inspectors pursuant to this Chapter.
(2)(a) Hold hearings and proceedings in accordance with statutes governing
the commission and the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act to consider
violations of the provisions of this Chapter and the rules and regulations of the
commission.
(b) The commission shall retain special counsel to conduct disciplinary
proceedings and prosecute violations at regular or special meetings whenever
Page 12 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
deemed necessary, and may retain special hearing officers at the discretion of the
commission. These proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with R.S. 49:975
et seq. This provision does not limit special counsel to only matters of a disciplinary
proceeding, however, the commission's general counsel will not be utilized for
prosecuting cases.
(3) Suspend or revoke any license for any cause described in this Chapter,
or for any cause prescribed by the rules and regulations and refuse to grant any
license for any cause which would be grounds for revocation or suspension of a
license.
(4) Issue fines, penalties, administrative costs as determined by the
commission, and other costs for violations of the provisions of this Chapter and the
rules and regulations of the commission.
(5) Publish and distribute materials containing such information as it deems
proper to accomplish the purpose of this Chapter.
L.(1) If a possible violation is known to the commission, the commission
may correct it or take appropriate action without formal complaint.
(2) If the commission receives a complaint that is based on a license or rules
violation, or any provision of this Chapter, a proceeding shall not be initiated after
five years from the date of the alleged act or omission giving rise to the complaint.
This period is interrupted by the filing of a procedural motion, or suspended as
provided in Paragraph (3) of this Subsection.
(3) The time period provided in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection is
suspended during the pendency of a legal action involving the licensee as a party or
witness if the complaint arises from the same facts giving rise to the legal action or
arises from the licensee's activities in the legal action. For the purposes of this
Subsection, "legal action" includes litigation, arbitration, mediation, administrative
proceedings, or other disciplinary proceedings. This provision does not limit or
prohibit the issuance of a summary suspension pursuant to R.S. 49:977.3 in the event
the commission finds that public health, safety, or welfare requires emergency
action.
Page 13 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
M. Notwithstanding any other provisions to the contrary and to the extent
deemed necessary or appropriate by the commission for the efficient implementation
of its responsibilities in accordance with this Chapter, the commission may delegate
its powers and duties by specific resolution of the commission.
N. The commission may consolidate, add, or remove license classifications
or specialty and general license classifications by rule.
O. The commission shall have no employees. The board's staff may be
utilized by the executive director to carry out the provisions of this Chapter and the
commission's responsibilities.
§3731. Domicile; meetings; compensation; quorum; books and records; audit report
A.(1) The commission shall meet in the city of Baton Rouge, which place
is fixed as the domicile of the commission.
(2) Meetings of the commission are subject to the Open Meetings Law, R.S.
42:11 et seq.
(3) Unless otherwise provided by law, all meetings of the commission shall
be conducted in accordance with Robert's Rules of Order.
B. The commission shall hold regular meetings in January, April, July, and
October of each calendar year. The chairman may call special meetings of the
commission as he deems necessary. The meeting time shall be designated by the
chairman. Notice of commission meetings shall be posted on the commission's
website and at the commission's office at least ten days prior to the date when the
commission is to meet.
C. At least two days before the date a special meeting is held, notice of the
time, place, and purpose of the meeting shall be sent by the chairman or vice
chairman of the commission to the members of the commission by electronic means.
D. A majority of the members of the commission constitutes a quorum to
conduct business.
E. There shall be no voting by proxy.
F. The treasurer is responsible for receiving and accounting for all money
derived from the operation of this Chapter.
Page 14 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
G. The commission shall maintain a roster showing the names and places of
business of all persons licensed by the commission. The roster shall be made
available on the commission's official website.
H. The secretary of the commission shall oversee and attest to the minutes
of each meeting. These minutes shall be made available to each commission
member and to the public upon adoption of those minutes at the next scheduled
meeting of the commission.
I. Within one hundred fifty days of the last day of each calendar year, a
certified public accounting firm approved by the state official charged with the
auditing of public records and accounts shall audit the financial records of the
commission, submit the report of its audit to the legislative auditor, and shall file a
copy of that audit with the secretary of state to be attached to the report of the
commission on file.
PART II. CODE ADOPTION AND ENFORCEMENT
§3732. Adoption and promulgation of certain building codes and standards as
Uniform Construction Code; procedures
A. Code review committees established by the commission shall advise,
review, and recommend amendment of the Uniform Construction Code to the
commission. The commission shall review and finalize the adoption and amendment
of the Uniform Construction Code, and promulgate changes to the Uniform
Construction Code, in accordance with all of the following:
(1) The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations to amend the
Uniform Construction Code in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative
Procedure Act.
(2)(a) The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations to adopt the
Uniform Construction Code in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 49:966(B)(12), the Senate Committee on
Commerce, Consumer Protection, and International Affairs; the Senate Committee
on Health and Welfare; the House Committee on Commerce; and the House
Page 15 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
Committee on Health and Welfare have oversight of the initial adoption of the
Uniform Construction Code.
(b) The Senate Committee on Commerce, Consumer Protection, and
International Affairs and the House Committee on Commerce shall receive notice
of intent to amend the Uniform Construction Code and have oversight of any
amendment pursuant to the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act.
(3)(a) The commission shall review, evaluate, and amend the codes within
the Uniform Construction Code no later than five years from the date of publication
of the appropriate code. The commission shall submit the amended Uniform
Construction Code to the House Committee on Commerce and the Senate Committee
on Commerce, Consumer Protection, and International Affairs for oversight and
approval. The commission shall provide each house of the legislature with a
summary of any major proposed amendments to the International Residential Code
at the time of submission to the oversight committees.
(b) The commission may suspend the five-year deadline in Subparagraph (a)
of this Paragraph for a period of up to one year in the event of a declaration of
disaster or emergency by the governor, or by the president of the United States, a
pandemic, or other acts of God.
(4) The commission shall, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure
Act, adopt or amend provisions of the Uniform Construction Code to satisfy any
requirement of a consent decree or order entered in a federal court of competent
jurisdiction relative to maintaining or building a public sewage system. These
provisions shall specify in which municipalities or parishes the rules and regulations
adopted pursuant to this Paragraph apply.
§3733. Mandatory adoption of certain nationally recognized codes and standards as
the State Uniform Construction Code; adoption by reference
A. The commission shall evaluate, adopt, and amend only the latest editions
of all of the following as the Uniform Construction Code:
(1) International Building Code (IBC), not including Chapter 1-Scope and
Administration, and Chapter 27-Electrical. The applicable standards referenced in
Page 16 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
that code are included for the regulation of construction within this state. The
appendices of that code may be adopted as needed, but the specific appendix or
appendices shall be referenced by name or letter designation at the time of adoption.
(2) International Existing Building Code (IEBC), not including Chapter 1-
Scope and Administration. The applicable standards referenced in that code are
included for the regulation of construction within this state. The appendices of that
code may be adopted as needed, but any specific appendix or appendices shall be
referenced by name or letter designation at the time of adoption.
(3) International Residential Code (IRC), not including Part I-
Administrative, and Part VIII-Electrical. The applicable standards referenced in that
code are included for the regulation of construction within this state. The
commission shall not adopt or enforce any part of the International Residential Code
or any other code or regulation that requires a fire protection sprinkler system in one-
or two-family dwellings. A municipality or parish shall not adopt or enforce an
ordinance or other regulation requiring a fire protection sprinkler system in one- or
two-family dwellings.
(4) International Mechanical Code (IMC). The applicable standards
referenced in that code are included for the regulation of construction within this
state. The appendices of the code provided in this Paragraph may be adopted as
needed, but any specific appendix or appendices shall be referenced by name or letter
designation at the time of adoption.
(5) International Plumbing Code (IPC). The applicable standards referenced
in that code are included for the regulation of construction within this state. The
appendices of that code may be adopted as needed, but any specific appendix or
appendices shall be referenced by name or letter designation at the time of adoption.
(6) International Fuel Gas Code (IFGC). The applicable standards referenced
in that code are included for the regulation of construction within this state. The
appendices of the code provided in this Paragraph may be adopted as needed, but any
specific appendix or appendices shall be referenced by name or letter designation at
the time of adoption.
Page 17 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
(7) International Energy Conservation Code (IECC) and all optional
compliance paths contained therein, and the standards referenced in that code. The
applicable standards referenced in that code are included for the regulation of
construction within this state.
(8) National Electrical Code (NEC).
B. The initial code adopted by the commission pursuant to the provisions of
this Part became effective on January 1, 2007.
C.(1) The state health officer may provide the commission with
recommended amendments to the plumbing provisions adopted pursuant to this
Section. All recommended amendments provided to the commission by the state
health officer shall be presented to the commission for review. The commission
shall review recommended amendments and vote on whether or not to include those
amendments as part of the Uniform Construction Code at the next regularly
scheduled meeting of the commission, but no sooner than thirty days after receipt.
(2) Nothing in this Section nor any provisions adopted pursuant to this
Section shall lessen the licensing qualifications and requirements provided in R.S.
37:1361 et seq.
§3734. Codes applicable to building inspections
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a licensed inspector shall
conduct a building inspection using the requirements of the codes in effect for the
locality on the date of the application for the original building permit.
§3735. Powers of state fire marshal
A.(1) The state fire marshal may enter into an agreement by letter of intent
with a public entity to enforce the Uniform Construction Code on behalf of a
municipality or parish as provided in R.S. 37:3740.
(2)(a) An agreement pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection may
include a provision allowing the state fire marshal to take into consideration practical
and unreasonable economic hardships before applying the strict requirements of this
Chapter. Pursuant to a contractual agreement with a municipality or parish executed
in accordance with the provisions of this Subsection and upon appeal of the
Page 18 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
professional of record for a plan review of a structure, except one- or two-family
dwellings, the state fire marshal may allow alternative materials, design, and
methods of construction and equipment that comply with the provisions of the
International Building Code, Chapter 1-Scope and Administration, relative to
alternative materials, design, and methods of construction and equipment.
(b) The state fire marshal may adopt, in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act, the provisions set forth in the International Building Code, Chapter
1-Scope and Administration, relative to alternative materials, design, and methods
of construction and equipment.
B. Nothing in this Chapter prevents the state fire marshal from enforcing the
fire protection, life safety, accessibility, and high-rise laws of this state, the
enforcement of which is his statutory and regulatory responsibility.
C. The fire marshal shall enforce the fire protection, egress, and accessibility
provisions of the Uniform Construction Code, excluding the provisions for one- and
two-family dwellings, with referenced standards as adopted by the commission in
accordance with R.S. 37:3733.
§3736. Municipalities and parishes; home rule charter
A. Nothing in this Chapter shall conflict with the provisions of Article VI,
Sections 4 and 6 of the Constitution of Louisiana pertaining to the powers, functions,
and duties of local governments; the structure and organization of, or the particular
distribution and redistribution of the powers and functions of, any local government
operating pursuant to a home rule charter; or prohibit a local government from
adopting ordinances for the local administration of the construction code provided
for in this Chapter or for any procedures in connection with the local enforcement
of the provisions of this Chapter.
B. In the enforcement of any provision of the construction code provided for
in this Chapter, if any provision of this Chapter conflicts with the provisions of a
home rule charter pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties of a local
government; or with the structure, organization, or distribution of the powers and
Page 19 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
functions of that local government; the provisions of that home rule charter
supersede the conflicting provisions of this Chapter.
§3737. Enforcement of the Uniform Construction Code by municipalities and
parishes
A.(1) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary relating to the authority of
local governments to enforce building codes, all municipalities and parishes in this
state shall enforce only the Uniform Construction Code provided in this Chapter and
as promulgated in the commission's rules and regulations. Licensed contractors, and
homeowners exempted from the contractor licensing law pursuant to R.S. 37:2157,
may establish agreements with private inspectors to conduct plan reviews,
inspections, and enforce the State Uniform Construction Code. All public entities,
licensed contractors, and homeowners shall use only inspectors licensed by the
commission to enforce this Chapter. Enforcement procedures by licensed inspectors
include examination or review of plans, drawings, or specifications; the conducting
of inspections; and the issuance, denial, or revocation of permits. A local
jurisdiction shall not accept an inspection report or plan review for the enforcement
of the Uniform Construction Code from a private inspector unless that inspector has
a contract to provide inspection services with that jurisdiction for which they are
performing the inspection, or has registered with that jurisdiction. Nothing in this
Chapter allows any local government to avoid enforcement, or to otherwise amend
any of the mandatory construction code provisions required in this Chapter, or to
prohibit licensed contractors or homeowners from using licensed private inspectors.
(2) To register with a jurisdiction, a private inspector shall provide that
jurisdiction with his commission registration number, a copy of his professional
liability insurance, and a list of the types of inspections he is certified to perform.
The private inspector shall submit a report of each inspection performed to the
proper jurisdiction. All inspection reports and plan reviews are subject to approval
or denial, in writing, by the Certified Building Official of the jurisdiction based on
the current adopted code.
Page 20 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
(3) Each authority having jurisdiction shall make all public records
pertaining to building permits available to registered private inspectors without the
need for individual requests for information per permit.
(4) Any jurisdiction rejecting an inspection report provided by a registered
private inspector shall provide a reason for the rejection in writing, and shall include
the code reference that relates to any identified violation.
(5) Any person whose inspection report or plan review is denied by a local
governing authority having jurisdiction may appeal such action through an appeal
process established by that local governing authority.
B. Nothing in this Part shall conflict with the United States Department of
Housing and Urban Development regulations regarding manufactured housing
construction or the provisions of R.S. 51:912.21 et seq. related to manufactured
housing installation. It is the intent of the legislature that any service, renovation,
repair, or warranty work on a manufactured home is performed in accordance with
the appropriate federal standards governing manufactured housing construction or
state standards governing installation, and that all such work be subject to the
authority of the commission. Any jurisdiction that collects a fee for the placement
of manufactured housing shall confirm through inspection that the installation meets
the requirements as set forth by the commission, and that all egress paths meet
International Residential Code standards.
C. In connection with the construction of any building, structure, or other
improvement to immovable property, neither the performance of any enforcement
procedure nor any provision of Uniform Construction Code constitutes or is to be
construed as a warranty or guarantee by a governmental enforcement agency as to
durability or fitness, or as a warranty or guarantee by an inspector who contracts or
registers with a municipality or parish as provided for in R.S. 37:3740, that a
building, structure, or other improvement to immovable property or any materials,
equipment, or method or type of construction used in that work is or will be free
from defects, will perform in a particular manner, is fit for a particular purpose, or
will last in any particular way. In the enforcement of any provision of the Uniform
Page 21 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
Construction Code provided for in this Chapter, or of any regulations pursuant to
R.S. 33:4771 et seq., the performance or nonperformance of any procedure by a
governmental enforcement agency, contract employee, official, or inspector is a
discretionary act and subject to the provisions of R.S. 9:2798.1.
D. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a municipality or parish shall
not require that a residential building plan for a one- or two-family dwelling be
prepared or stamped by a licensed architect or engineer if that dwelling falls within
the prescriptive standards of the International Residential Code currently adopted in
the Uniform Construction Code.
E.(1) Upon receipt of the certificate of occupancy issued by a local inspector
for a new residential construction, a lender providing a residential mortgage loan for
the purchase of that new residential construction shall file a copy of the certificate
of occupancy in the conveyance records of the parish where that new residential
construction is located. Failure of the lender to file that document in the local
conveyance records does not invalidate the legal effects of any transaction related
to that property, including but not limited to the construction, purchase, sale, or
transfer of title of the new residential construction.
(2) The owner of the new residential construction shall provide the lender
a copy of the certificate of occupancy.
(3) A lender that files a copy of the certificate of occupancy in the local
conveyance records pursuant to the provisions of this Subsection may assess a
reasonable charge to the borrower for all costs associated with the filing of that
certificate, not to exceed the amount charged by that parish for filing those
documents.
(4) If the provisions of this Chapter cease to be enforced by a parish, the
provisions of this Section become null and void in that parish.
F. A public entity may accept determinations made by the state fire marshal
as they pertain to life safety and fire protection as required in this Chapter.
G. The building official for the parish, municipality, or regional planning
commission, as authorized pursuant to R.S. 37:3740 and appointed pursuant to R.S.
Page 22 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
37:3741, or a properly-licensed inspector designated by that building official, shall
enforce the plumbing provisions adopted pursuant to this Chapter.
H. For purposes of enforcement of the Uniform Construction Code pursuant
to this Section, a properly-licensed inspector shall conduct all inspections of any
commercial or residential structure, and be present on site for all inspections other
than roofing inspections, reinspections where that inspector previously visited the
site, and emergency utility reconnection inspections. The building official may
accept photographs or videos that are location-verified with geotagging for required
roofing or reroofing inspections of any commercial or residential structure,
reinspections where the same inspector previously visited the site, and emergency
utility reconnection inspections.
I. Any municipality or parish that issues a permit for construction pursuant
to this Chapter shall do all of the following:
(1) Permit and inspect all buildings, other than one- and two-family
dwellings, for roof construction and reroofing in compliance with the International
Building Code Chapter 15 requirements as adopted and promulgated by the
commission.
(2) Permit and inspect one- and two-family dwellings for roof construction
and reroofing in compliance with the International Residential Code Chapters 8 and
9 requirements as adopted and promulgated by the commission.
§3738. Exemptions relating to enforcement of Uniform Construction Code
A. Excluding the applicable requirements of the International Plumbing
Code, the provisions of this Chapter do not apply to any construction or
improvement inside the secured or fenced confines of industrial facilities that are
engaged in activities classified as one or more of the following subsectors, industry
groups, or industries of the 2012 North American Industry Classification System:
(1) 22111 electric power generation.
(2) 3211 saw mills and wood preservation.
(3) 322 paper manufacturing.
(4) 324 petroleum and coal products manufacturing.
Page 23 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
(5) 325 chemical manufacturing.
(6) 326 plastics and rubber products manufacturing.
(7) 331 primary metal manufacturing.
(8) 562211 hazardous waste treatment and disposal.
(9) 562212 solid waste landfill.
(10) 424710 petroleum bulk stations and terminals.
(11) 486110 pipeline transportation of crude oil.
(12) 486910 pipeline transportation of refined petroleum products.
(13) 482610 pipeline transportation of natural gas.
(14) 486990 all other pipeline transportation.
(15) 211112 natural gas liquid extraction.
(16) 211 oil and gas extraction.
(17) 3212 veneer, plywood, and engineered wood product manufacturing.
(18) 486 pipeline transportation.
(19) 213 support activities for mining.
B.(1)(a) For the purposes of this Section, "farm structure" means a structure
constructed on a farm, other than a residence or a structure attached to it, for use on
the farm including but not limited to barns, sheds, and poultry houses but not public
livestock areas. "Farm structure" does not include a structure originally qualifying
as a farm structure, but later converted to another use.
(b) For the purposes of this Section, "residential accessory structure" means
a structure not exceeding two hundred square feet in footprint, and not attached to
a residence, that is used as an accessory to the primary use of the residence, and not
constructed in regions where the ultimate design windspeed required by the Uniform
Construction Code, as promulgated by the commission, equal or exceed one hundred
thirty miles per hour in hurricane-prone regions.
(2) The governing authority of a parish or municipality shall not enforce that
portion of the Uniform Construction Code which regulates the construction or
improvement of a farm structure or private outdoor recreational structure, other than
a residence or structure attached to a residence, such as a hunting or fishing camp or
Page 24 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
residential accessory structure. However, a municipality with a population in excess
of forty-five thousand according to the latest federal decennial census may enforce
that portion of the Uniform Construction Code which regulates the construction or
improvement of a residential accessory structure.
(3) For residential or commercial construction, the standards published by
the Federal Emergency Management Agency for the National Flood Insurance
Program apply.
(4) The provisions of this Section do not affect the power of the governing
authority of a parish or municipality to issue building permits for the construction or
improvement of a farm or private outdoor recreational structure.
C. The provisions of this Chapter do not apply to the construction or
improvement of any project totally owned by the federal government.
D.(1) The regulation of a utility provider's authority to operate and serve
customers is a matter of statewide concern. No code, ordinance, land use restriction
or general or specific plan provision or part of a code, ordinance, land use regulation
or general or specific plan provision adopted by a parish or municipality may
prohibit or restrict a person's or entity's ability to use the services of a utility provider
that is capable and authorized to provide the utility service at a person's or entity's
property.
(2) A parish or municipality shall not deny a permit application based on the
utility provider proposed to provide utility service to the project.
(3) A parish or municipality issuing a building permit shall ensure that all
applicable permits and associated fees assessed on a building permit applicant
contain requirements and amounts that do not exceed the requirements and amounts
for use of other utility providers and do not have the effect of restricting a permit
applicant's ability to use the services of a utility provider that is capable and
authorized to provide utility service.
(4) This Section does not prohibit a parish or municipality from recovering
reasonable costs associated with reviewing a building permit, issuing a building
permit, and performing inspections to verify code compliance.
Page 25 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
(5) A parish or municipality shall not impose a fine, penalty, or other
requirement that restricts a utility provider's authority to operate or serve customers.
(6) This Section does not affect the authority of a parish or municipality to
manage the public highways within its boundaries, or to exercise its police powers
to review and approve an application before issuing a permit to perform work in the
public highways, or to enforce associated permit conditions.
(7) This Section does not affect the authority of a parish or municipality to
manage or operate a publicly-owned utility.
(8) For the purposes of this Section, "utility service" means natural gas
provided to an end user.
(9) The provisions of this Section apply notwithstanding any contrary
provision of law.
E. Nothing in this Chapter or any provision adopted pursuant to this Chapter
prohibits the Louisiana Department of Health from doing any of the following:
(1) Regulating stored water temperatures through enforcement of the
Sanitary Code.
(2) Regulating medical gas and medical vacuum systems.
F. An order or consent decree relative to maintaining or building a public
sewage system that is entered in a federal court of competent jurisdiction supersedes
the plumbing provisions of this Part or plumbing provisions adopted pursuant to this
Part.
G. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, all manufactured
homes built to federal construction standards are subject only to the plumbing
provisions in federal law. Manufactured homes are not subject to state plumbing
regulations, whether the manufactured home is connected to a public or private
sewer system. However, that connection shall be completed and maintained by a
plumber licensed in this state.
H. State-owned buildings are not subject to local permitting, review, or
oversight but are required to comply with the flood zone requirements of the
National Flood Insurance Program in accordance with R.S. 40:1724.
Page 26 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
§3739. Mandamus and injunctive relief for violation of code or regulation; penalties
For a violation of the Uniform Construction Code or a regulation adopted
pursuant to this Chapter, the local building official may enjoin further construction
of the project as provided by local ordinance. The municipal, district, or parish
attorney, attorney general, or other appropriate authority of a political subdivision,
in addition to other remedies, may apply for injunctive relief, mandamus, or other
appropriate proceeding in the district court of the parish where the violation
occurred.
§3740. Agreements with other governmental entities for provision of services;
private agreements
A public entity may establish an agreement with another public entity of this
state, or with a licensed private inspector, to issue permits and enforce the Uniform
Construction Code in accordance with this Chapter. In the event of such an
agreement, the maximum fees applicable to the issuance of permits and the
enforcement of the code shall be established by the governing body of the public
entity. A public entity that establishes an agreement with another public entity of
this state, or with a licensed private inspector, to enforce the Uniform Construction
Code shall not impose a fee for an inspection not performed by that municipality or
parish if a fee for the inspection was collected by the public entity or the licensed
private inspector that actually performed the inspection.
§3741. Appointment of building official or contractual arrangement for such
services; affidavit for exemption
A public entity shall appoint a person to act as its building official to oversee
the unincorporated area of the public entity. Only a licensed inspector holding a
general license classification may be appointed to act as a building official of a
public entity. A person shall not be appointed as a building official or inspector for
that public entity if he has any interest in any legal entity that performs commercial
or residential construction within the jurisdiction in which he would be appointed.
Nothing in this Chapter prevents a municipality or parish from appointing and
employing additional licensed inspectors necessary to perform the required
Page 27 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
inspections and technical duties and prescribing fees for construction permits and
inspections as provided by law.
§3742. Conflicts of interest
A. A licensed private inspector shall not perform inspections on any project
in which that inspector has a direct or indirect financial interest. Nothing in this
Section prohibits a licensed private inspector from holding other professional
licenses, provided no conflict of interest exists with respect to a specific project.
B. A person acting as a licensed public inspector shall not act as a licensed
contractor with the board or as a licensed plumber with the State Plumbing Board
within the same jurisdiction in which he has authority, is employed by, or is
contracted to.
C. A staff member, agent, employee, or inspector of a public entity or of a
private inspection company shall not make a final decision on an administrative
decision required by this Chapter if the outcome of that decision would have a direct,
substantial, and readily identifiable financial impact on that staff member, or if the
applicant or other person subject to that decision is a person with whom the staff
member has a familial relationship, business, or other associational relationship. If
the person making that final decision has a conflict of interest pursuant to this
Section, that decision shall be assigned to his supervisor, or to another person as may
be designated by the development regulation or other ordinance. A person shall not
be financially interested in, or employed by a business that is financially interested
in a development subject to regulation pursuant to this Chapter unless that person is
the owner of the land or building involved. A person or other individual or an
employee of a company contracting with a public entity to provide staff support shall
not engage in any work that is inconsistent with his duties or with the interest of the
public entity, as determined by the public entity.
D. An employee or member of an inspection department shall not be
financially interested in, or employed by a business that is financially interested in,
the furnishing of labor, material, or appliances for the planning, specification,
construction, alteration, or maintenance of a building within the public entity's
Page 28 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
planning and development regulation jurisdiction unless he is the owner of that
building. A member or other individual of an inspection department, or employee
of a company contracting with a public entity to conduct inspections, shall not
engage in work that is inconsistent with his duties or with the interest of the public
entity as determined by that public entity.
E. A licensed inspector shall comply with all provisions of the Code of
Governmental Ethics and any other applicable state ethics laws.
F. A licensed inspector performing an inspection on a building or structure
shall disclose a conflict of interest if that inspector has any of the following
characteristics:
(1) Owns any interest in the legal entity that constructed that structure or
receives any compensation as an inspector from the legal entity.
(2) Worked for the owner, developer, contractor, or project manager of the
project to be inspected within the last three years.
(3) A familial relationship to the owner, developer, contractor, or project
manager of the project to be inspected.
(4) A financial or business interest in the project to be inspected.
G. If a licensed inspector has a conflict of interest pursuant to this Section,
the inspection of the relevant building or structure shall be assigned to the supervisor
of that inspector or to another inspector designated by the public entity or private
inspector company.
PART III. LICENSING
§3743. License types, classifications, and general information
A. In accordance with R.S. 37:3730, the commission may issue the
following types of inspector licenses:
(1) Public Inspector.
(2) Private Inspector.
B.(1) A public inspector or private inspector may be classified in the
category of a general license classification or a specialty license classification.
Page 29 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
(2) A licensee holding a general license classification is permitted to perform
any work specified within a specialty license classification for any structure.
"Certified Building Official", "Master Code Professional", "Louisiana Licensed
Architect", and "Louisiana Licensed Engineer" are categorized as general license
classifications.
C. An applicant for a general or specialty license classification is required
to meet the relevant qualification requirements promulgated in the commission's
rules and regulations in addition to all other licensing requirements pursuant to R.S.
37:3744 prior to licensure.
D. An applicant for an inspector license shall meet the licensing
requirements provided in R.S. 37:3744 to obtain that license. After those license
requirements have been met, the license will be issued to the applicant, and the
license shall state the inspector's license classification for which he has completed
all of the relevant requirements. Following issuance of the license by the
commission, the inspector shall do all of the following:
(1) Adhere to the license requirements during the license's active period
pursuant to R.S. 37:3746.
(2) Perform only inspection work included in the license classification within
which his license was issued.
(3) Conduct all transactions and perform work in the name that appears on
both his current license and in the official records of the commission.
(4) Notify the commission of any change to the information provided on his
application within thirty days of that change.
E. A licensee may request additions or changes to an existing license by
application, and these changes become effective after that license successfully
completes all relevant requirements, including any license classification requirement,
and pays the required fee.
F. Pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter, license expiration and renewal
procedures are as follows:
Page 30 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
(1) An initial license and any subsequent renewal issued expires one year
from the date on which the license was originally issued.
(2) A license expires on the last day of the period for which it was issued
unless renewed. A person failing to make timely renewal of his license, which
includes meeting all renewal requirements prior to the expiration of his license, is no
longer licensed and shall not practice until licensed in accordance with this Chapter.
(3) A licensee is eligible for renewal of his license sixty days before the
expiration of that license. If a licensee does not renew his license within one year of
its expiration, his license is no longer eligible for renewal, and an application for a
new license may be submitted, and upon approval, a new license shall be issued.
(4) After a license has expired, the licensee has fifteen days following the
expiration date to apply for renewal without incurring a delinquent fee and a lapse
in his licensure.
(5) The renewal of a license is based upon a determination made by the
commission of the applicant's participation in continuing education programs. The
commission shall promulgate regulations setting forth the continuing education
requirements for inspectors.
G. A license issued pursuant to this Chapter is not transferable.
§3744. Application and renewal requirements
A. The licensing requirements for the inspector licenses include submission
of all of the following:
(1) For initial licensure or renewal, a completed application on a form
adopted by the commission. No application shall be considered from any state or
local governmental body, including any agency of any state or local governmental
body, or any corporation or other entity owned or controlled by a state or local
governing body.
(2) Any identifying information required by the commission. An applicant
for renewal shall verify his identifying information on record with the commission
and provide updated information if a change occurs. An applicant for a license shall
be a United States citizen or legal resident of the United States. All identifying
Page 31 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
information and the applicant's answers to any background questions are subject to
verification. Identifying information may include the following:
(a) Full legal name.
(b) Date of birth.
(c) Contact information, including physical address, phone number, and
email address.
(d) Social security number, if the applicant is a citizen of the United States.
(e) Individual Taxpayer Identification Number, United States Citizenship
and Immigration Services number, or Visa number, if the applicant is not a citizen
of the United States.
(f) Employer identification number of a legal business entity, or if the
business is a disregarded entity, the employer identification number of its parent
company.
(3) For a private inspector company applicant, a financial statement on a
form supplied by the commission. The financial statement and any information
contained within, as well as any other financial information required to be submitted
by a contractor, shall be confidential and not subject to the provisions of the Public
Records Law, R.S. 44:1 et seq. The financial statement and its information shall
contain all of the following:
(a) The name of the private inspector company.
(b) Information current to within twelve months of the date of filing the
application.
(c) Proof of a net worth of at least ten thousand dollars, or the commission
may allow an applicant to submit an irrevocable letter of credit in the amount of the
net worth requirement plus the amount of the applicant's negative net worth, if any.
(d) Verification and signature by an accountant, bookkeeper, or certified
public accountant, or in lieu of a signature by a certified public accountant on the
commission's form, a current financial statement prepared by a certified public
accountant may be attached.
Page 32 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
(e) Verification and signature by the applicant affirming all information is
true and correct.
(4) For a private inspector applicant or for the principal of a private inspector
company applicant, information required by the commission for a background
investigation, including identification, criminal history, and financial history. The
commission may deny approval of an applicant or its principal for cause. The
background investigation shall include all of the following:
(a) Fiduciary or monetary matters including but not limited to any
bankruptcy, judgment, insolvency, or lien.
(b) Any criminal offense resulting in a conviction, guilty plea, or plea of nolo
contendere.
(5) For a public inspector applicant, information required by the commission
for a background investigation, including identification and criminal history. The
commission may deny approval of a public inspector applicant for cause. The
background investigation shall be conducted in relation to any criminal offense
resulting in a conviction, guilty plea, or plea of nolo contendere.
(6)(a) Professional liability insurance certificates evidencing a minimum
coverage amount of five hundred thousand dollars shall be submitted by private
inspector applicants for a private inspector company. There is no professional
insurance coverage requirement for licensure for public inspector applicants
employed by public entities.
(b) Proof of insurance coverage shall be provided by an agent, broker, or
insurance company showing all of the following:
(i) The name of the licensee.
(ii) The name of the insurance company.
(iii) The name and address of the insurance broker.
(iv) The insurance policy number.
(v) The beginning and ending insurance coverage dates. Coverage shall be
for a minimum of six months.
(vi) No exclusions for the scope of work for which the licensee is licensed.
Page 33 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
(vii) The commission listed as a certificate holder.
(c) Failure to maintain continuous professional liability insurance coverage
during the active period of the license may be grounds for suspension or revocation
of the license and other disciplinary action by the commission.
(7) Proof of business registration with the secretary of state. A license shall
not be issued to a business entity that is not registered with the secretary of state or
does not hold a certificate of authority to do business in good standing.
(8) Documentation to verify the identity of an applicant or to verify a
business entity's formation, structure, and its current owners or principals. This may
include a government-issued identification card, a government-issued driver's
license, articles of incorporation, articles of organization, a certificate of formation,
a partnership agreement, bylaws, an operating agreement, meeting minutes, and any
amendments made to those documents.
(9) Any applicable fees, fines, or other sums due to the commission shall be
paid in full.
B. A license shall not be issued to a business entity that operates as a trade
name, assumed name, or a "doing-business-as" name. A license may only be issued
to a legal business entity. Only the name of a legal business entity or the legal name
of an individual shall be shown on the official records of the commission.
C. An applicant who provides any false statement, answer, or information
may be rejected by the commission and a new application may be requested. If any
false statement, answer, or information is discovered after a license has been issued,
the commission may suspend that license and take other disciplinary action.
D. An initial license application is considered pending until all licensing
requirements are met and the license is issued or denied by the commission. If an
application remains pending for one year from the date of submission, the
application is invalid.
E. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, criminal
background information in the possession of the board or the commission is
confidential and shall not be disclosed to others outside of the agency except as
Page 34 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
necessary for action on the application of the applicant. However, any such record
may be released to the public in an administrative proceeding before the board or
commission, and any final determination made by the board or commission relative
to the fitness of any person to receive or to continue to hold a license issued by the
board or commission and any legal grounds upon which such determination is based
shall be a public record, as provided by R.S. 44:4(51)(a). This is not to be construed
to interfere or with limit the jurisdiction and oversight of the legislative auditor or
the inspector general. Criminal history records obtained from the Louisiana Bureau
of Criminal Identification and Information shall be exempt from public disclosure
pursuant to R.S. 44:3 and shall not be released publicly by the board or the
commission.
F.(1) An applicant denied licensure due to a background investigation may
appeal to the commission.
(2) A denied applicant may request in writing a review of the denial by the
commission within thirty calendar days from receipt of the denial.
(3) The commission shall review the denial at its next regularly scheduled
meeting and affirm or reverse the denial.
(4) The person who requested the appeal shall be notified of the
commission's final decision in writing.
(5) The commission shall provide written notice of any denial, suspension,
or revocation to the applicant within ten business days, including the specific
grounds for such action and notice of the right to appeal pursuant to the
Administrative Procedure Act.
§3745. Licensing fees
A.(1) To defray the cost of issuing licenses and of administering the
provisions of this Chapter, the commission may set reasonable fees to be assessed
pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter, and reasonable penalties to be assessed for
late applications for renewal of licenses; however, the basic license fee shall be no
more than one hundred dollars, and the fee for additional classifications shall be a
lesser amount set by the commission.
Page 35 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
(2) All fees received by the commission in accordance with this Chapter
shall be solely used to effectuate the provisions of this Chapter.
(3) All fees shall be paid prior to the issuance of a license or other changes
or additions to an existing license.
(4) Any and all licensing fees for public inspectors are waived.
B. Fees for licenses shall not exceed the following amounts:
(1) Classification qualification research fee $50.00
(2) License fee $100.00
(3) Renewal fee $100.00
(4) Delinquent fee $25.00
(5) Applicant investigative fee $50.00
(6) Renewal investigative fee $50.00
(7) Processing fee $25.00
(8) Insurance lapse fee, first offense $250.00
(9) Insurance lapse fee, second or subsequent offense $500.00
(10) Request for state license verification fee $25.00
(11) License reinstatement/reactivation fee $250.00
(12) Legal name change fee $25.00
(13) Business structure change fee $50.00
§3746. Requirements of a licensee; record keeping; duty to report
A.(1) A licensee has a duty to maintain and provide unredacted records to
the commission as it may require to ensure the licensee is in compliance with the
law. The licensee shall maintain these records for five years. A licensee shall
provide records upon request by the commission within five business days of receipt
of the request.
(2) A licensee shall maintain on record with the commission current contact
information, such as legal name, mailing address, email address, phone numbers, or
any other required information. The licensee's email address on record with the
commission shall be used for official correspondence. Failure to maintain current
information with the commission may delay the issuance of a license, the timely
Page 36 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
renewal of a license, or the receipt of updates to laws, rules, and regulations related
to this industry.
(3) A licensee shall maintain all requirements for licensure, including but not
limited to all of the following:
(a) Professional liability insurance without a lapse in coverage, pursuant to
R.S. 37:3744.
(b) Classification requirements for any active classification held by the
licensee. This includes any required certifications held with another agency, board,
commission, council, organization, or with the International Code Council.
(c) Active status with the secretary of state if the private inspector is
operating under a business name.
(4) A licensee shall provide written notification to the board within thirty
calendar days of any of the following occurrences:
(a) A change to any information provided in the original application or in
any amendment to that application, such as changes to his contact information,
changes to his employment with a public entity or private inspector company, or
changes to a private inspector company's ownership or business structure.
(b) A criminal, civil, or administrative action instituted or pending in another
jurisdiction against or involving the licensee or a principal of the licensee.
B. Failure to comply with the provisions of this Section may result in
disciplinary action by the commission pursuant to R.S. 37:3747.
PART IV. DISCIPLINARY MEASURES
§3747. Revocation and suspension of licenses; issuance of cease-and-desist orders;
debarment; violations; penalty; criminal penalty
A. A person shall not act as an inspector unless that person holds an active
inspector license in accordance with this Chapter. The commission may revoke,
suspend, or refuse to renew a license; issue cease-and-desist orders to stop work;
issue fines and penalties; or debar any person licensed pursuant to this Chapter for
any of the following violations:
Page 37 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
(1) Failing to comply with this Chapter or the commission's rules and
regulations.
(2) Failing to continuously maintain the requirements for licensure.
(3) Undertaking, attempting to, submitting, offering to conduct, supervise,
superintend, oversee, direct, or in any manner assume charge of the performance of
building inspections as a building inspector, or the review or examination of
construction documents as a plans examiner for the enforcement of the Uniform
Construction Code, without possessing the required license or the required license
classification.
(4) Performing a job for which a particular license classification is required
when the licensee does not hold the relevant license classification for the majority
of work performed.
(5) Passing inspections or approving work performed by a contractor for a
construction project on a commercial or residential structure that is not in
compliance with the Uniform Construction Code.
(6) Passing inspection or approving work performed by a contractor for a
construction project on a commercial or residential structure when that contractor
failed to obtain the proper permits and any other required documents from a parish,
municipality, or public entity within its jurisdiction for that construction project.
(7) Passing inspection or approving work for a construction project on a
commercial or residential structure where the scope of work being performed by a
contractor has exceeded the scope of work permitted by the parish, municipality, or
public entity within its jurisdiction.
(8) Passing inspection or approving work for a construction project on a
commercial or residential structure where there is a conflict of interest as provided
in R.S. 37:3742.
(9) Any effort to deceive or defraud the public.
(10) A dishonest or fraudulent act by a licensee which has caused damage
to another, as adjudged by a court of competent jurisdiction.
Page 38 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
(11)(a) The following actions are violations of the authority of the
commission:
(i) Enforcing a code requirement in an area or circumstance not specified in
that requirement.
(ii) Enforcing a requirement in a manner that is more stringent than or
exceeding the code requirement.
(iii) Refusing to implement or adhere to an interpretation of the Uniform
Construction Code issued by the commission.
(iv) Enforcing a code official's preference in the method or manner of
installation if that preference is not required by the Uniform Construction Code or
contradicts a manufacturer's installation instructions or specifications.
(b) The actions listed in Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph are violations
regardless of whether that action results in a criminal conviction, guilty plea, or plea
of nolo contendere. A criminal conviction or plea for any of the actions listed in
Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph shall independently constitute a violation and
grounds for disciplinary action. The commission may also find a violation through
its own administrative proceedings without a criminal conviction.
(12) Making or filing a report or record that the licensee knows to be false,
or knowingly inducing another to file a false report or record, or knowingly failing
to file a report or record required by state or local law, or knowingly impeding or
obstructing such filing, or knowingly inducing another person to impede or obstruct
such filing.
(13) Failing to properly enforce applicable building codes or permit
requirements within this state which the licensee knows are applicable, or
committing willful misconduct, gross negligence, gross misconduct, repeated
negligence, or negligence resulting in danger to life or property.
(14) Issuing a building permit to a contractor, or any person representing
himself or herself as a contractor, without obtaining the contractor's license number
where such a license is required in accordance with R.S. 37:2150 et seq.
Page 39 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
(15) Publishing, transmitting, distributing, or otherwise publicly circulating
a misleading or false claim related to a person's license status or classification in any
medium, including but not limited to digital platforms.
(16) Misrepresentation of fact by an applicant in obtaining a license;
misrepresentation of fact by an applicant or licensee in providing information,
statements, or documents to the commission; deception by omission; and providing
false testimony to the commission.
(17)(a) Permitting a license to be used for any purpose by any person other
than the person to whom the license is issued.
(b) Misrepresentation or fraudulent use of a license for any purpose by any
person other than the person to whom the license is issued.
(18) A problem related to the ability of the inspector to enforce the Uniform
Construction Code.
(19) Disqualification or debarment by any public entity.
(20)(a) Failing to provide a written notification to the commission of any
change to the information provided in the original application or in any amendment
within thirty calendar days.
(b) Failing to provide written notification to the commission of a criminal,
civil, or administrative action instituted or pending in another jurisdiction against or
involving the licensee or a principal of the licensee within thirty days.
(21)(a) Failing to provide a written report on each construction project
relative to his duties as a licensed inspector for the enforcement of the Uniform
Construction Code for compensation.
(b) Rendering, submitting, subscribing, or verifying false, deceptive,
misleading, or unfounded opinions, inspections, reports, photographs, or any other
documents relative to his duties as a licensed inspector for the enforcement of the
Uniform Construction Code.
(22) Assisting a person to circumvent the provisions of this Chapter.
(23) Abandoning or failing to perform his duties as a licensed inspector,
without justification.
Page 40 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
(24) Failing to contract or perform work in the name that appears on the
current license and in the official records of the commission.
(25) Failing to maintain and provide to the commission requested records,
documents, or other information within five business days of receipt of the request.
B. In the event of a revocation of a license, that license holder is ineligible
to apply for a license for five years following that revocation. Upon a determination
that a person has engaged in deceptive practices to meet the requirements for
licensure, that person shall be ineligible for licensure for a period of five years.
C. The commission may refuse to license any entity that has been debarred
pursuant to R.S. 39:1672. The commission may hold a hearing for any licensee
debarred pursuant to R.S. 39:1672 and suspend or revoke that license, order the
licensee to discontinue all work as an inspector, or debar a person or licensee from
acting as an inspector for any public entity for up to five years.
D. Any party to the proceeding who is aggrieved by the action of the
commission may appeal the decision in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act.
E. In accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act,
any person who applies for and is denied a license by the commission, or whose
license has been revoked, rescinded, or suspended, may appeal to the Nineteenth
Judicial District Court to determine whether the commission has abused its
discretion.
§3748. Local regulatory authority; permit offices; staff; building permits
A. The commission or its designee, or the board or its designee, may inspect
the list of building inspections and plans inspections performed by public or private
inspectors in this state to verify that no person is working as an inspector without an
active license. Upon request, parish and municipal permitting authorities shall
provide the commission or its designee, or the board or its designee, all unredacted
documents relating to inspections.
B. The commission or its designee, or the board or its designee, may inspect
the list of permits issued by each local building permit official in this state to verify
Page 41 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
that no person is working as a contractor without an active license. Upon request,
parish and municipal permitting authorities shall provide to the commission or its
designee, or the board or its designee, any documents relating to building permits,
applications, and inspections.
C. A local building department shall not issue a building permit to a person
who does not hold an active license with the board with the appropriate classification
for the scope of work for which the permit is issued. Nothing in this Section
prohibits a local building department from issuing a permit for work that does not
require a license pursuant to this Chapter.
D. The local building permit official shall require an applicant claiming an
exemption for residential construction activities to submit an affidavit attesting to the
claimed exemption. That affidavit shall be executed on a form provided by the board
and submitted to the local building permit official prior to the issuance of a permit.
The affidavit shall be included in the permit file of the local regulatory authority.
E. The provisions of this Chapter preempt any municipal or other local
regulatory examination authority over licensees. If a governing authority or any
municipality or parish finds that the state minimum standards do not meet its needs,
the local government may with approval of the commission provide requirements
more stringent than those specified by the state.
§3749. Engaging in business of inspecting without authority prohibited; penalty
A.(1) It is unlawful for any person to engage in or to continue in this state
in the business of inspecting, or to act as an inspector as defined in this Chapter,
unless he holds an active license as an inspector in accordance with this Chapter.
(2) It is unlawful for any inspector, licensed or unlicensed, to publish,
transmit, distribute, or otherwise publicly circulate a misleading or false claim
related to a person's license or classification in any medium, including but not
limited to digital platforms.
B. It is sufficient for an indictment, information, or complaint to allege that
the accused unlawfully engaged in business as an inspector without authority from
the commission.
Page 42 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
C.(1) Any person found to be in violation of this Section shall be guilty of
a misdemeanor offense and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than five
hundred dollars for each violation, or imprisoned for three months, or both.
(2) Notwithstanding any action taken by the board, any person who does not
possess a license from the board, violates any of the provisions of this Section, and
causes harm or damage to another in excess of three hundred dollars, upon
conviction, shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five
thousand dollars, or imprisoned, with or without hard labor, for not less than six
months, or both.
(3) Any fine assessed and collected in accordance with the provisions of this
Section shall be remitted to the commission.
D. The district attorney for the jurisdiction in which a violation occurs has
sole authority to prosecute criminal actions pursuant to this Section.
§3750. Violations; civil penalty; jurisdiction
A. A private inspector or private inspector company that violates a provision
of this Chapter shall, after notice and a hearing, be liable to the commission for a fine
of no more than five thousand dollars for each offense. In addition to the fine, the
commission may impose administrative costs and attorney fees for each offense. In
determining the amount of the administrative penalty, the commission may consider
the circumstances and seriousness of the violation, cooperation on the part of the
inspector, and the history of previous violations.
B. Any fine, administrative costs, or attorney fee assessed by the commission
to a private inspector or a private inspector company shall be paid within ninety days
unless otherwise provided by law. Failure to pay an outstanding penalty may be
cause to suspend a license, deny issuance or renewal of a license, and may be subject
to collection efforts as provided by law.
C. In addition to or in lieu of the criminal penalties and administrative
sanctions provided in this Chapter, the commission may issue an order to cease and
desist to any person engaged in an activity, conduct, or practice constituting a
Page 43 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
violation of this Chapter. The order shall be issued in the name of the state and
under the official seal of the commission.
D. If the person to whom the commission directs a cease-and-desist order
does not cease or desist the prohibited activity, conduct, or practice immediately, the
commission may sue to enjoin the person or firm from engaging in any activity,
conduct, or practice prohibited by this Chapter.
E. Upon proper showing by the commission that a person has engaged or is
engaged in an activity, conduct, or practice prohibited by this Chapter, the court shall
issue a temporary restraining order restraining that person or firm from engaging in
that activity, conduct, or practice pending a hearing on a preliminary injunction. A
permanent injunction may be issued after a hearing, commanding the cessation of
that activity, conduct, or practice without the commission giving a bond. A
temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction issued
pursuant to the provisions of this Section is not subject to being released upon bond.
F. In a suit for an injunction, the commission may demand a penalty
provided in Subsection A of this Section. A judgment for penalty, attorney fees, and
costs may be rendered in the same judgment in which the injunction is made final.
If the commission brings an action against a person pursuant to the provisions of this
Section and fails to prove its case, then it shall be liable to that person for his
attorney fees and court costs.
G. The trial of the proceeding for injunction shall be summary and by the
judge without a jury.
H. Anyone violating this Chapter who fails to cease work after proper
hearing and notification from the commission is not eligible to apply for an inspector
license for a period up to one year from the date of the official notification to cease
work.
I. Upon the expiration of the delays set forth in the Administrative Procedure
Act for an aggrieved party to appeal a fine or penalty assessed by the commission,
if an appeal has not been filed, the commission may initiate civil proceedings against
the violating party seeking a judgment for the amount of the fine assessed, together
Page 44 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
with legal interest and reasonable attorney fees incurred by the commission in
bringing the action. The proceedings shall be conducted on a summary basis, with
the defendant being limited to the defense of lack of notice as to the meeting of the
commission during which the fine was assessed. A proceeding brought pursuant to
this Subsection may lie in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state.
J. In addition to all other authority granted to the commission by the
provisions of this Chapter, the commission may issue to any person alleged to have
violated this Chapter a citation setting forth the nature of the alleged violation, and
the options of pleading no contest to the charge, paying a fine to the commission
prescribed by this Chapter, or appearing at an administrative hearing conducted by
the commission regarding the alleged violation. That citation may be issued by a
person authorized by the commission in person, by certified mail with a return
receipt, or by email with a delivery receipt from the cited person. This Subsection
is not applicable to any criminal enforcement action brought pursuant to this
Chapter.
Section 3. R.S. 42:262(A) is hereby amended and reenacted as follows:
§262. Special attorney or counsel
A. In the event that the attorney general, or any state agency, board, or
commission, not including any public postsecondary education institution, is
represented by a special attorney or counsel, the special attorney or counsel shall not
be compensated for such representation on a contingency fee or percentage basis in
the absence of express statutory authority, including R.S. 17:100.10, R.S. 23:1669,
R.S. 37:2153 and 3730, R.S. 41:724 and 922, R.S. 42:1157.3, R.S. 46:15, R.S.
47:1512, 1515.3, 1516, 1516.1, and 1676. In retaining a special attorney or counsel,
preference shall be given to private attorneys licensed to practice law in this state and
law firms domiciled and licensed in this state.
* * *
Page 45 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
Section 4. R.S. 44:4(51) and 4.1(24) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
44:4(65) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4. Applicability
This Chapter shall not apply:
* * *
(51)(a) To any records, writings, accounts, recordings, letters, exhibits,
pictures, drawings, charts, photographs, memoranda, reports, examinations, or
evaluations, or copies thereof, in the custody of the State Licensing Board for
Contractors concerning the fitness of any person to receive or continue to hold a
license issued by the board. However, any such record may be released to the public
in an administrative proceeding before the board, and any final determination made
by the board relative to the fitness of any person to receive or to continue to hold a
license issued by the board and any legal grounds upon which such determination is
based shall be a public record.
(b) To any records, writings, accounts, recordings, letters, exhibits, pictures,
drawings, charts, photographs, memoranda, reports, examinations, or evaluations,
or copies thereof, in the custody of the Louisiana State Licensing Board for
Contractors or the Louisiana Uniform Construction Code Commission concerning
the fitness of any person to receive or continue to hold a license issued by the
commission. However, any such record may be released to the public in an
administrative proceeding before the commission, and any final determination made
by the commission relative to the fitness of any person to receive or to continue to
hold a license issued by the commission and any legal grounds upon which such
determination is based shall be a public record.
* * *
(65) To any financial statement requested by the Louisiana Uniform
Construction Code Commission in regard to a private inspector company application
pursuant to R.S. 37:3744.
* * *

Page 46 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1186 ENROLLED
§4.1. Exceptions
* * *
B. The legislature further recognizes that there exist exceptions, exemptions,
and limitations to the laws pertaining to public records throughout the revised
statutes and codes of this state. Therefore, the following exceptions, exemptions, and
limitations are hereby continued in effect by incorporation into this Chapter by
citation:
* * *
(24) R.S. 37:74, 86, 90, 147, 691, 711.10, 763, 763.1, 781, 799, 920.1, 969.1,
1123(E), 1249.1, 1277, 1278, 1285, 1326, 1338.1, 1360.53.1, 1360.104.1, 1518,
1745.15, 1747, 1806, 2156.1, 2406, 2505.1, 2863.1, 3276.2, 3481, 3507.1, 3744
* * *
Section 5. Part IV-A of Chapter 8 of Title 40 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 40:1730.21 through 1730.40.2, is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 6. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
to review all statutes being changed by this Act and in all locations it deems appropriate
change "Louisiana State Uniform Construction Code Council" to "Louisiana Uniform
Construction Code Commission".
Section 7. The provisions of R.S. 37:3730(C)(1) as enacted by Section 1 of this Act
shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 47 of 47
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.